Oklahoma, session 2026, SB30.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 10 O.S. 2021, Section 403, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 99, O.S.L. 2022 (10 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 403), is amended to read as follows:


Section 403. A. The provisions of the Oklahoma Child Care


Facilities Licensing Act shall not apply to:


1. Care provided in a child’s own home or by relatives;


2. Informal arrangements which parents make with friends or


neighbors for the occasional care of their children;


3. Care provided by an attorney-in-fact authorized by Section


700 of this title who exercises parental or legal authority on a


continuous basis for not less than twenty-four (24) hours and

Req. No. 497 Page 1


without compensation for the intended duration of the power of


attorney;


4. Programs in which school-aged children three (3) years of


age and older are participating in home-schooling;


5. Programs that serve children three (3) years of age and


older and that are operated during typical school hours by a public


school district;


6. Programs that serve children three (3) years of age and


older and that are operated during typical school hours by a private


school that offers elementary education in grades kindergarten


through third grade;


7. Summer youth camps, summer programs or after-school programs


for children who are at least four (4) years of age, that are


accredited by a national standard-setting agency or church camp


accreditation program, or are accredited by, chartered by or


affiliated with a national non-profit organization;


8. Programs in which children attend on a drop-in basis and


parents are on the premises and readily accessible;


9. A program of specialized activity or instruction for


children that is not designed or intended for child care purposes


including, but not limited to, scouts, 4-H clubs and summer resident


youth camps, programs that limit children from enrolling in multiple


sessions because of the type of activity or ages accepted and



Req. No. 497 Page 2


single-activity programs such as academics, athletics, gymnastics,


hobbies, art, music, dance and craft instruction;


10. Any child care facility that:


a. provides care and supervision for fifteen (15) or


fewer hours per week,


b. operates less than ten (10) weeks annually,


c. operates in the summer for less than eight (8) hours


per day, or


d. provides care and supervision for school-aged children


only in a center-based program for twenty-one (21) or


fewer hours a week and is located in a county with a


population of less than one hundred thousand (100,000)


according to the latest Federal Decennial Census;


11. Facilities whose primary purpose is medical treatment;


12. Boarding schools that have education as their primary


purpose and that are recognized as accredited by the State Board of


Education. To be exempt, such programs shall:


a. have classroom facilities that are not used for


residential living,


b. not have been granted nor have assumed legal custody


of any child attending the facility, and


c. adhere to standard educational holiday and seasonal


recess periods to permit students reasonable



Req. No. 497 Page 3


opportunities to return to their primary places of


residence with parents or legal guardians;


13. Day treatment programs and maternity homes operated by a


licensed hospital;


14. Juvenile facilities certified by the Office of Juvenile


Affairs or certified by any other state agency authorized by law to


license such facilities;


15. A program where children are not enrolled by the parents


and are free to come and go;


16. A program in tribal land as defined at 25 U.S.C.A., Section


1903 (10); and


17. A program on a military base or federal property, or a


facility licensed as a family child care provider by a branch of the


United States Department of Defense or by the United States Coast


Guard; and


18. A family child care home that operates for thirty (30) or


fewer hours per week.


B. The provisions of the Oklahoma Child Care Facilities


Licensing Act shall be equally incumbent upon all private and public


child care facilities.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-497 DC 12/16/2024 12:39:59 PM



Req. No. 497 Page 4